dictsource/ik_rules
/ This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Iñupiaq

.group a
        a        a
        aa       a:
        
.group ch 
        ch       TS
        
.group g
        g        g
        
.group ġ      
        ġ        G

.group h 
        h        h
 
.group i
        i        i
        ii       i:
        
.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l
        
.group ḷ
        ḷ        l#

.group ł
        ł        l^
        
.group m
        m        m
        
.group n 
        n        n
        
.group ñ 
        ñ        N

.group ŋ
        ŋ        n.
        
.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        q
        
.group r
        r        r
        
.group s
        s        s
        sr       s.
        
.group t
        t        t
        
.group u
        u        u
        
.group v
        v        v
        
.group w
        w        w
        
.group y
        y        y    
